Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
Article 4 Sale of Payment Instruments

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982, effective July 1, 2014, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this article and enacted the current article. The former article consisted of Code Section 7-1-680 through 7-1-684, 7-1-684.1, 7-1-685 through 7-1-687, 7-1-687.1, 7-1-688, 7-1-689, 7-1-689.1, 7-1-689.2, 7-1-690 through 7-1-692, relating to sale of checks or money orders, and was based on Ga. L. 1965, p. 81, §§ 2-17; Code 1933, §§ 41A-3201 — 41A-3213, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, §§ 35-36; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1717, §§ 8-9; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 7; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1131, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 458, § 10; Ga. L. 1990, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1780, § 3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 7; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, §§ 26-28; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 18; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 843, §§ 10-15; Ga. L. 2004, p. 458, §§ 6-7; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 27/SB 82; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, §§ 17/SB 70 — 24/SB 70; Ga. L. 2009, p. 86, §§ 8/HB 141—141/HB 141; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 7/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2013, p. 30, § 2/SB 139.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Money transmission and related financial services, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Department of Banking and Finance, Banks, Chapter 80-3-1.

7-1-680.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Authorized agent” means a person designated by a licensee pursuant to Code Section 7-1-683.1 to engage in money transmission, the sale of payment instruments, or the issuance of payment instruments.

“Check” means any check, money order, draft, or negotiable demand instrument.

“Closed-loop transaction” means a transaction where the value or credit is primarily intended to be redeemed for a limited universe of goods, intangibles, services, or other items provided by the issuer of the payment instrument, its affiliates or agents, or others involved in the transaction functionally related to the issuer or its affiliates or agents.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of banking and finance.

“Control,” “controlling,” “controlled by,” or “under common control with” means the direct or indirect possession of power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person or the direct or indirect possession of power to elect or appoint a majority of executive officers or other persons exercising managerial authority of a person.

“Covered employee” means any employee of a licensee or an authorized agent engaged in any function related to the selling of payment instruments or money transmission.

“Department” means the Department of Banking and Finance.

“Executive officer” means the chief executive officer, president, chief financial officer, chief operating officer, each officer with responsibility involving policy-making functions for a significant aspect of a person’s business, or any other individual performing similar managerial or supervisory functions with respect to any organization, whether incorporated or unincorporated.

“Individual” means a natural person.

“Licensee” means a person, including, but not limited to, a money transmitter and a payment instrument seller, duly licensed by the department pursuant to this article.

“Misrepresent” means to make a false statement of a substantive fact. The term may also mean to engage in any conduct which leads to a false belief which is material to the transaction.

“Monetary value” means a medium of exchange, whether or not redeemable in money.

“Money transmission,” “transmit money,” or “transmission of money” means engaging in the business of receiving money or monetary value for transmission or transmitting money or monetary value within the United States or to locations abroad by any and all means, including, but not limited to, an order, wire, facsimile, or electronic transfer. The term does not include closed-loop transactions.

“Money transmitter” means a person licensed under this article to transmit money.

(14.1)

“Multistate licensing process” means any licensing agreement entered into by and among state agencies that regulate money transmitters and sellers of payment instruments.

“Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” means a licensing system developed and maintained by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators for the licensing and registration of certain persons engaged in nondepository activities.

“Open-loop transaction” means a transaction using a payment instrument with stored value to redeem for goods or services at any location that accepts such payment instrument.

(16.1)

“Passive investor” means a person that:

Owns, directly or indirectly, at least 10 percent but less than 25 percent interest in or voting shares of a licensee or person in control of a licensee;

Does not have the power to elect a majority of the members of the board of directors of a licensee;

Is not employed by and does not perform any managerial duties for the licensee or person in control of a licensee; and

Does not have the power to exercise, directly or indirectly, a controlling influence over the management or policies of a licensee or person in control of a licensee.

“Payment instrument” means any instrument, order, or device for the payment or transmission of money or monetary value, whether or not it is a negotiable instrument under the terms of Article 3 of Title 11, relating to negotiable instruments. The term includes, but is not limited to, checks, money orders, drafts, stored value cards, and open-loop transactions. The term does not include closed-loop transactions, credit card vouchers, letters of credit, or any instrument that is redeemable by the issuer only in specific goods or services of the issuer.

“Payment instrument holder” means a person that has purchased a payment instrument from a payment instrument seller or who has had monetary value transmitted by a money transmitter.

“Payment instrument issuer” or “payment instrument seller” means a person licensed under this article to engage in the issuance or sales of payment instruments.

“Person” means any individual, sole proprietorship, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, trust, or any other group of individuals, however organized.

“Sale” and “selling” mean the passing of title from the payment instrument seller or the payment instrument seller’s agent to a payment instrument holder or remitter or an agreement to transfer money or monetary value.

“Sale of payment instruments,” “selling of payment instruments,” or “issuance of payment instruments” means the creation, issuance, or sale of a payment instrument that is redeemable in cash or monetary value.

“Signed” shall have the same meaning as provided in Code Section 11-1-201.

“Ultimate equitable owner” means a person that:

Owns, directly or indirectly, a 10 percent or more interest in a corporation or any other form of business organization;

Owns, directly or indirectly, 10 percent or more of the voting shares of any corporation or any other form of business organization; or

Exerts control, directly or indirectly, over a corporation or any other form of business organization, regardless of whether such person owns or controls such interest through one or more natural persons or one or more proxies, powers of attorney, nominees, corporations, associations, limited liability companies, partnerships, trusts, joint stock companies, other entities or devices, or any combination thereof.

For purposes of determining ultimate equitable ownership by an individual, the individual’s interest shall be aggregated with the interest of any other immediate family member, including the individual’s spouse, parents, children, siblings, mothers- and fathers-in-law, sons- and daughters-in-law, brothers- and sisters-in-law, and any other individual who shares such individual’s home.

“Unique identifier” means a number or other identifier assigned by protocols established by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

“Virtual currency” means a digital representation of monetary value that does not have legal tender status as recognized by the United States government. The term does not include the software or protocols governing the transfer of the digital representation of monetary value. The term also does not include units of value that are issued in an affinity or rewards program and that cannot be redeemed for money or virtual currencies. Neither does the term include an affinity or rewards program tied to a credit, debit, or prepaid card that awards points for purchases or other transactions, which points can be redeemed for dollar denominated credit to a checking, credit card, or prepaid account, or for a gift card, goods, travel, or services.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-680

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3C-2/SB 65; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 1-6/HB 811; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 30/HB 891.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” in paragraphs (15) and (25).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “or the direct or indirect possession of power to elect or appoint a majority of executive officers or other persons exercising managerial authority of a person” at the end of paragraph (5), substituted “each officer” for “each vice president” and “or any other individual” for “secretary, treasurer, or any other person” in paragraph (8), added paragraphs (14.1) and (16.1), and added the last sentence in paragraph (24).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 1-1/SB 65, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:

“(a)
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Debtor Creditor Uniform Law Modernization Act of 2015.’

“(b)
To promote consistency among the states, it is the intent of the General Assembly to modernize certain existing uniform laws promulgated by the Uniform Law Commission affecting debtor and creditor rights, responsibilities, and relationships and other federally recognized laws affecting such rights, responsibilities, and relationships.”

7-1-681.
Licensing requirements; engagement in sale of payment instruments or money transmission defined; liabilities.

Pursuant to this article, the department may license a person to engage in the sale of payment instruments or the transmission of money.

A license for the sale of payment instruments authorizes the licensee to sell payment instruments and to transmit money.

A license for the transmission of money authorizes the licensee to transmit money.

No person, regardless of the location of such person, its facilities, or its agents, shall engage in the sale of payment instruments or money transmission without having first obtained a license authorizing such activity under this article. This prohibition applies whether or not a person utilizes a branch, subsidiary, affiliate, or agent in this state. A person is deemed to be engaged in the sale of payment instruments or money transmission if the person advertises any of those services, provides any of those services with or without compensation, solicits to provide any of those services, or holds itself out as providing any of those services to or from this state, even if the person has no physical presence in this state.

Every person that directly or indirectly controls another that violates subsection (d) of this Code section, including but not limited to each general partner, executive officer, joint venture, ultimate equitable owner, or director of such person, and every person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions as such person violates with and to the same extent as such person. Any person that directly or indirectly controls a person that violates subsection (d) of this Code section may avoid liability if such person sustains the burden of proof that the person did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care, could not have known of the existence of the facts by reason of which the original violation is alleged to exist.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-681

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982.

7-1-682.
Exemption from licensing requirements.

The requirement for licensure set forth in this article shall not apply to:

Any state or federally chartered bank, trust company, credit union, savings and loan association, or savings bank when such bank, trust company, credit union, savings and loan association, or savings bank has deposits that are federally insured;

Any authorized agent of a licensee;

The United States Postal Service;

A state or federal governmental department, agency, authority, or instrumentality and its authorized agents;

Any foreign bank that establishes a federal branch pursuant to the International Bank Act, 12 U.S.C. Section 3102;

A wholly owned subsidiary of a state or federally chartered bank, trust company, credit union, savings and loan association, or savings bank when such bank, trust company, credit union, savings and loan association, or savings bank has deposits that are federally insured;

A registered futures commission merchant under the federal commodities laws to the extent of its operation as such a futures commission merchant;

A person that provides clearance or settlement services pursuant to a registration as a clearing agency or an exemption from such registration granted under the federal securities laws to the extent of its operation as such a provider;

An operator of a payment system to the extent that it provides processing, clearing, or settlement services, between or among persons exempted by this Code section, in connection with wire transfers, credit card transactions, debit card transactions, stored value transactions, automated clearing-house transfers, or similar fund transfers;

A person registered as a securities broker-dealer under federal or state securities laws to the extent of its operation as such a broker-dealer; or

An individual employed by a licensee or any person exempted from the licensing requirements of this article when acting within the scope of employment and under the supervision of the licensee or exempted person as an employee and not as an independent contractor.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-682

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 27/HB 185; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 35/HB 111; Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 7/HB 1428.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, deleted “or” at the end of paragraph (5); added paragraphs (6) through (10); and redesignated former paragraph (6) as present paragraph (11).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “this Code section” for “this section” in paragraph (9).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “or savings bank when such bank, trust company, credit union, savings and loan association, or savings bank has deposits” for “or savings bank with deposits” in paragraphs (1) and (6).

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “clearing-house” for “clearing house” in paragraph (9).

7-1-683.
Requirements for licensure; fees; rules and regulations.

Each applicant for a license under this article shall:

Submit an application in writing, which is made under oath and in such form as the department may prescribe;

Furnish to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry the following information:

The legal name and principal office address of the person applying for the license;

The name, residence, and business address of each director, ultimate equitable owner, and executive officer;

If the applicant has one or more branches or other locations, including but not limited to locations operated by an authorized agent, at or through which the applicant proposes to engage in the sale of payment instruments or money transmission within this state, the complete address of each such location; and

The location where its initial registered office will be located in this state, if any; and

Submit such other data, financial statements, and pertinent information as the department may require with respect to the applicant, its directors, trustees, officers, members, ultimate equitable owners, subsidiaries, affiliates, or agents.

The application for license shall be filed together with:

An investigation and supervision fee established by the department through rule or regulation which shall not be refundable but which, if the license is granted, shall satisfy the fee requirement for the first licensed year or the remaining part thereof;

Items required by other provisions of this article, including but not limited to Code Sections 7-1-683.2 and 7-1-684; and

Other information as may be required by the department.

Where a person engages only in the sale of payment instruments issued by another person which is primarily obligated for payment of the payment instrument and the seller is a wholly owned subsidiary of or is wholly owned by the sole shareholder of the issuer, the department may grant a single license naming both the seller and issuer as joint licensees. In such cases, only a single license fee shall be collected and only one corporate surety bond, pursuant to Code Section 7-1-683.2, shall be required where such bond names both the seller and issuer.

The department shall pay all fees received from licensees and applicants related to applications, licenses, and renewals to the Office of the State Treasurer; provided, however, that the department may net such fees to recover the cost of participation in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

The department shall enact rules and regulations regarding the time frame by which all persons must submit an original or renewal application for licensure through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-683

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” in paragraph (a)(2), and in subsections (d) and (e).

7-1-683.1.
Locations for conduct of business; contracting with authorized agent; requirements of agent.

As authorized by this Code section, a licensee may conduct its business through designated authorized agents at one or more locations in this state, so long as such locations have been included in the licensee’s application and reports as required by Code Section 7-1-683 and subsection (d) of Code Section 7-1-686. The department may refuse within 30 days after application, for cause, to approve a licensee’s designation of an authorized agent. In such cases the authorized agent shall have the same procedural rights as are provided in this article for the denial of an application for a license. No additional license other than that obtained by the licensee shall be required of any authorized agent of a licensee. An authorized agent of a licensee shall sell payment instruments or transmit money only at the location designated in the written notice provided to the department.

Licensees desiring to conduct licensed activities through authorized agents shall enter into a written contract with the authorized agent. The contract shall authorize the agent to operate only pursuant to the terms of the contract and shall specifically designate the authorized activities that the agent may engage in on behalf of the licensee. Upon request of the department, a licensee shall provide the department with a copy of the executed written contract between the licensee and its authorized agent.

Upon the department receiving written notice from the licensee designating an authorized agent, the authorized agent shall be:

Required to operate in full compliance with this article, the rules and regulations promulgated under this article, and any applicable order issued by the commissioner;

Required to timely remit all money legally due to the licensee in accordance with the terms of the written contract between the licensee and the authorized agent;

Prohibited from utilizing subagents to carry out its responsibilities;

Subject to examination and investigation by the department as set forth in this article, including, but not limited to, the requirements of Code Section 7-1-689;

Subject to administrative actions, including, but not limited to, the revocation or suspension of its authorization to act as an authorized agent, a cease and desist order, and the imposition of fines; and

Required to comply with applicable state and federal law.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-683.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 7/HB 90.

7-1-683.2.
Bonding.

An applicant shall provide with its application a corporate surety bond issued by a bonding company or insurance company authorized to do business in this state and approved by the department. The bond for payment instrument sellers shall be in the principal sum of $250,000.00. The bond for money transmitters shall be in the principal sum of $100,000.00.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, the department may require an applicant or a licensee to provide additional coverage for the adequate protection of payment instrument holders if the average daily outstanding balances for payment instrument sellers exceed the current bond amount, the average daily outstanding orders to transmit not yet paid for money transmitters exceed the current bond amount, or the department determines that additional coverage is necessary in order to satisfy the department that the provisions of subsection (a) of Code Section 7-1-684 are fulfilled. A licensee’s level of outstandings shall be determined by the portion of the licensee’s financial reports dealing with transactions originating in Georgia which shall be submitted to the department as set forth in its rules and regulations. However, under no circumstances shall the additional bond coverage required by the department exceed $2,000,000.00.

The bond shall be in a form satisfactory to the department and shall run to the State of Georgia for the benefit of the department or any payment instrument holders against the licensee or its agents. The condition of the bond shall require the licensee to pay any and all moneys for the benefit of any person damaged by noncompliance of a licensee or its agent with this article, with the rules and regulations enacted pursuant to this article, or with any condition of the bond or to pay any and all moneys that may become due and owing any creditor of or claimant against the licensee arising out of the licensee’s sale of payment instruments or money transmission in this state, whether through its own acts or the acts of an agent. Damage payments due under the bond include moneys owed to the department for fees, fines, or penalties. In no event shall the aggregate liability of the surety exceed the principal sum of the face amount of the bond. Claimants against the licensee may bring an action directly on the surety bond.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-683.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982.

7-1-683.3.
Authority of department.

The department is authorized to:

Participate in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry in order to facilitate the sharing of information and standardization of the licensing and application processes for persons subject to this article;

Enter into operating agreements, information sharing agreements, interstate cooperative agreements, and other contracts necessary for the department’s participation in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry;

Disclose or cause to be disclosed without liability, via the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, applicant and licensee information, including, but not limited to, violations of this article and enforcement actions, to facilitate regulatory oversight across state jurisdictional lines;

Request that the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry adopt an appropriate privacy, data security, and security breach notification policy that is in full compliance with existing state and federal law; and

Establish and adopt, by rule or regulation, requirements for participation by applicants and licensees in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry upon the department’s determination that each requirement is consistent with both the public interest and the purposes of this article.

The department shall enact rules and regulations establishing a process whereby licensees may challenge information entered by the department on the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

Irrespective of its participation in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, the department shall retain full and exclusive authority over determinations of whether to grant, renew, suspend, or revoke licenses issued under this article. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to reduce or otherwise limit such authority.

Information disclosed through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry is deemed to be disclosed directly to the department and subject to Code Section 7-1-70. Such information shall not be disclosed to the public and shall remain privileged and confidential pursuant to Code Section 7-1-70.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-683.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” throughout this Code section.

7-1-684.
Investigation of applicants for licensure; background checks on employees and others.

The department shall conduct an investigation of every applicant for licensure to determine the financial responsibility, experience, character, and general fitness of such applicant. The department may issue the applicant a license to transmit money or sell payment instruments if the department determines to its general satisfaction that:

The applicant is financially sound and responsible and able to transmit money or sell payment instruments in an honest, fair, and efficient manner and with the confidence and trust of the community; and

All conditions for licensure set forth in this article or the rules and regulations of the department have been satisfied.

The department shall not issue a license or may revoke a license if it finds that the applicant, licensee, or authorized agent; any person who is a director, officer, partner, covered employee, or ultimate equitable owner of the applicant, licensee, or authorized agent; or any individual who directs the affairs of or controls or establishes policy for the applicant, licensee, or authorized agent has been convicted of a felony in any jurisdiction or of a crime which, if committed within this state, would constitute a felony under the laws of this state. For the purposes of this article, a person shall be deemed to have been convicted of a crime if such person shall have pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to a charge thereof before a court or federal magistrate or shall have been found guilty thereof by the decision or judgment of a court or federal magistrate or by the verdict of a jury, irrespective of the pronouncement of sentence or the suspension thereof and regardless of whether first offender treatment without adjudication of guilt pursuant to the charge was entered or an adjudication or sentence was otherwise withheld or not entered on that charge, unless and until such plea of guilty or such decision, judgment, or verdict shall have been set aside, reversed, or otherwise abrogated by lawful judicial process or until probation, sentence, or both probation and sentence of a first offender have been successfully completed and documented or unless the person convicted of the crime shall have received a pardon therefor from the President of the United States or the governor or other pardoning authority in the jurisdiction where the conviction occurred or shall have received an official certification of pardon granted by the state’s pardoning body where the conviction occurred which removes the legal disabilities resulting from such conviction and restores civil and political rights.

The department shall be authorized to obtain conviction data with respect to any applicant, licensee, or authorized agent, any person who is a director, officer, partner, covered employee, or ultimate equitable owner of the applicant, licensee, or authorized agent, or any individual who directs the affairs of or controls or establishes policy for the applicant, licensee, or authorized agent. The department may submit directly to the Georgia Crime Information Center two complete sets of fingerprints of such person, together with the required records search fees and such other information as may be required. Fees for background checks that the department administers shall be sent to the department by applicants, licensees, and authorized agents together with the fingerprints.

Upon request by the department, each applicant, licensee, or authorized agent, any person who is a director, officer, partner, covered employee, or ultimate equitable owner of the applicant, licensee, or authorized agent, or any individual who directs the affairs of or controls or establishes policy for the applicant, licensee, or authorized agent shall submit to the department two complete sets of fingerprints, the required records search fees, and such other information as may be required. Fees for background checks that the department administers shall be submitted to the department by applicants, licensees, and authorized agents together with two complete sets of fingerprints, and the department is authorized to net such fees to recover any costs incurred by the department related to running the background checks. Upon receipt of fingerprints, fees, and other required information, the Georgia Crime Information Center shall promptly transmit one set of fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a search of bureau records and an appropriate report and shall retain the other set and promptly conduct a search of its own records and records to which it has access. The Georgia Crime Information Center shall notify the department in writing of any derogatory finding, including, but not limited to, any conviction data regarding the fingerprint records check, or if there is no such finding. All conviction data received by the department or by the applicant, licensee, or authorized agent shall be used by the party requesting such data for the exclusive purpose of carrying out the responsibilities of this article, shall not be a public record, shall be confidential, and shall not be disclosed to any other person or agency except to any person or agency which otherwise has a legal right to inspect such data. All such records shall be maintained by the department and the applicant, licensee, or authorized agent pursuant to laws regarding such records and the rules and regulations of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Georgia Crime Information Center, as applicable. As used in this Code section, the term “conviction data” means a record of a finding, verdict, or plea of guilty or plea of nolo contendere with regard to any crime, regardless of whether an appeal of the conviction has been sought.

Every applicant and licensee shall be authorized and required to obtain and maintain the results of background checks on covered employees. Such background checks shall be handled by the Georgia Crime Information Center pursuant to Code Section 35-3-34 and the rules and regulations of the Georgia Crime Information Center. Applicants and licensees shall be responsible for any applicable fees charged by the Georgia Crime Information Center. An applicant or licensee may only employ a person whose background data has been checked and has been found to be in compliance with all lawful requirements prior to the initial date of hire. This provision does not apply to directors, officers, partners, or ultimate equitable owners of applicants or licensees or to persons who direct the affairs of or control or establish policy for applicants or licensees, whose background shall have been investigated through the department before taking office, beginning employment, or securing ownership. Upon receipt of information from the Georgia Crime Information Center that is incomplete or that indicates a covered employee has a criminal record in any state other than Georgia, the employer shall submit to the department two complete sets of fingerprint cards for such person, together with the applicable fees and any other required information. The department shall submit such fingerprints as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section.

Upon request by the department, an applicant, licensee, or authorized agent shall take all steps necessary to have an international criminal history background check performed on any directors, officers, partners, covered employees, or ultimate equitable owners of applicants, licensees, or authorized agents or persons who direct the affairs of or control or establish policy for applicants, licensees, or authorized agents. The results of such international criminal history background check shall be provided to the department.

Applicants and licensees shall have the primary responsibility for obtaining background checks on covered employees. The department shall be entitled to review the files of any applicant or licensee to determine whether the required background checks have been run and whether all covered employees are qualified. The department shall be authorized to discuss the status of employee background checks with applicants, licensees, and authorized agents. Notwithstanding any other provisions in this article, the department shall retain the right to obtain conviction data on covered employees of applicants, licensees, and authorized agents.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-684

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 26/HB 184; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “As used in this Code section, the term ‘conviction data’ ” for “As used in this Code section, ‘conviction data’ ” at the beginning of the last sentence of subsection (d).

7-1-684.1.
Reporting to Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.

Each licensee shall submit to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry timely reports of condition, which shall be in such form and contain such information as the department and the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry may require.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-684.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” throughout this Code section.

7-1-684.2.
Use of unique identifier of licensee.

The unique identifier of any licensee shall be clearly labeled on all advertisements and any other documents required by rule or regulation of the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-684.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251 § 1/HB 982.

7-1-685.
Expiration and renewal of licenses.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in this article, all licenses issued pursuant to this article shall expire on December 31 of each year, and each application for renewal shall be made annually on or before December 1 of each year. A license may be renewed by the filing of an application substantially conforming to the requirements of Code Section 7-1-683 as specifically modified in the department’s rules and regulations. No investigation fee shall be payable in connection with such renewal application. However, an annual license fee established by rule or regulation of the department to defray the cost of supervision shall be paid with each renewal application and shall not be refunded or prorated.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-685

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 7/HB 90.

7-1-686.
Display of license; license nontransferable and nonassignable; notification of additional locations.

A license issued pursuant to this article shall be kept conspicuously posted in the place of business of the licensee. If the licensee has no physical location in this state, then a copy of such license and the licensee’s unique identifier shall be clearly posted and accessible through whichever medium the licensee engages in the sale of payment instruments or money transmission in this state.

Such license shall not be transferable or assignable.

No licensee shall engage in the sale of payment instruments or money transmissions under any name or names other than those authorized by the department in writing.

A licensee shall give written notice to the department of its intent to operate any new or additional locations, including, but not limited to, locations operated by an authorized agent, not reported in either its original or renewal application. The required notice shall be in such form and contain such information as required by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-686

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 27/HB 184.